Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.115

Child taken into custody under court order—Information to parents.

If a child is taken into custody by child protective services pursuant to a court order issued under RCW 13.34.062, the child protective services worker shall take reasonable steps to advise the parents immediately, regardless of the time of day, that the child has been taken into custody, the reasons why the child was taken into custody, and general information about the child's placement. The department shall comply with RCW 13.34.060 when providing notice under this section.

[ 2000 c 122 s 39; 1990 c 246 s 10; 1985 c 183 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1990 c 246: See note following RCW 13.34.060.